Mississippi, session 2026, HB1903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is authorized and approved for expenditure out of any funds which are received by or otherwise become available to the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District, for the purpose of paying bond maturities, accrued interest, maintenance expenses, project development costs, and any other authorized expenses of the water management district, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................ $ 9,101,320.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1, the following positions are authorized: AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:           17 Time-Limited:         0 Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions and procedures established by law. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 3.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2026.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 5.  All monies in possession of the district in excess of necessary operating funds shall be deposited with a bank or banks selected by the board of directors of the district.  These funds shall be deposited in such bank or banks and in such manner that interest earned shall be at least equal to interest earnings on state funds deposited by the State Treasury. SECTION 6.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 7.  The money herein approved for expenditure shall be disbursed upon bank checks signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.